District of Columbia statutes.
22-1703

Permitting sale of lottery tickets on premises.

If any person shall knowingly permit, on any premises under his or her control in the District, the sale of any chance or ticket in or share of a ticket in any lottery or policy lottery, or shall knowingly permit any lottery or policy lottery, or policy shop on such premises, he or she shall be fined not less than $50 and not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or be imprisoned not more than 180 days, or both.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1330, ch. 854, § 864
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 2(k), 41 DCR 1639
Aug. 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-151, § 105(h), 41 DCR 2608
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 201(p), 60 DCR 2064
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 201(p) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 105(h) of the Omnibus Criminal Justice Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-255, June 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4286).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “and not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “nor more than $500”.
1973 Ed., § 22-1503.
1981 Ed., § 22-1503.
Search warrants, see § 23-521 et seq.